California, session 20252026, SB997.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The heading of Article 8 (commencing with Section 801) of the North Fork Kings Groundwater Sustainability Agency (Chapter 392 of the Statutes of 2016) is amended to read: Article 8. Fee and Penalty Authority: Liens: Collection of Unpaid FeesSEC. 2. Section 802 is added to the North Fork Kings Groundwater Sustainability Agency (Chapter 392 of the Statutes of 2016), to read:Sec. 802. Pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10732) of Part 2.74 of Division 6 of the Water Code, the agency may impose civil penalties on any person who extracts groundwater in excess of the amount that person is authorized to extract under a rule, regulation, ordinance, or resolution adopted by the agency.SEC. 3. Section 803 is added to the North Fork Kings Groundwater Sustainability Agency (Chapter 392 of the Statutes of 2016), to read:Sec. 803. (a) In the event that any charges for water and other services imposed by the agency pursuant to its authority pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10730) of Part 2.74 of Division 6 of the Water Code remain unpaid, the amount of unpaid charges may, in the discretion of the agency, be secured at any time by filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county a certificate specifying the amount of the charges and the name and address of the person liable therefor.(b) From the time of recordation of the certificate, the amount required to be paid together with any interest and penalties constitutes a lien upon all real property in the county owned by the person or afterwards, and before the lien expired, acquired by that person. The lien has the force, priority, and effect of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the date of the filing of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the filing of the certificate or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of the county recorder of any county, and from the time of that filing, the lien shall be extended to the real property in that county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.